District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.30

Activity reports.

(a)

Each registrant shall file with the Director of Government Ethics between the 1st and 10th day of July and January of each year a report signed under oath concerning the registrant’s lobbying activities during the previous 6-month period. If the registrant is not an individual, an authorized officer or agent of the registrant shall sign the form. A registrant shall file a separate activity report for each person from whom he or she receives compensation. The reports shall be public documents and shall be on a form prescribed by the Director of Government Ethics and shall include the following:

(1)

A complete and current statement of the information required to be supplied pursuant to § 1-1162.29;

(2)

(A)

Total expenditures on lobbying broken down into the following categories:

(i)

Office expenses;

(ii)

Advertising and publications;

(iii)

Compensation to others;

(iv)

Personal sustenance, lodging, and travel, if compensated;

(v)

Other expenses;

(B)

Each expenditure of $50 or more shall also be itemized by the date, name, and address of the recipient, and the amount and purpose of the expenditure;

(3)

Each political expenditure, loan, gift, honorarium, or contribution of $50 or more made by the registrant or anyone acting on behalf of the registrant to benefit an official in the legislative or executive branch, a member of his or her staff or household, or a political committee or political action committee established for the benefit of the official, be itemized by date, beneficiary, amount, and circumstances of the transaction; including the aggregate of all expenditures that are less than $50;

(4)

Each official in the executive or legislative branch and any member of the official’s staff, including personal and committee staff, who has a business relationship or a professional services relationship with the registrant shall be identified by name and the nature of the business relationship with the registrant;

(5)

Each official in the executive or legislative branch with whom the registrant has had written or oral communications during the reporting periods related to lobbying activities conducted by the registrant shall also be included in the report, identifying the official with whom the communication was made;

(6)

Each person whom the registrant has given compensation to lobby on his or her behalf; and

(7)

All bundled contributions in accordance with rules promulgated by the Ethics Board.

(b)

Each registrant shall obtain and preserve all accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents necessary to substantiate the activity reports required to be made pursuant to this section for 5 years from the date of filing of the report containing these items. These materials shall be made available for inspection upon requests by the Director of Government Ethics after reasonable notice.

(c)

Each registrant who does not file a report required by this section for a given period is presumed not to be receiving or expending funds that are required to be reported under this part.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 230, 59 DCR 1862
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-79, § 2(b), 61 DCR 153

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1162.28.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-79 substituted “political committee or political action committee” for “campaign or testimonial committee” in (a)(3); deleted “and” from the end of (a)(5); substituted “; and” for “shall also be listed in the report” in (a)(6); and added (a)(7).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-79: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-79 provided that the act shall apply upon the latest of: (1) The inclusion of the fiscal effect of the act in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register; or (2) January 31, 2015.

A certification dated February 4, 2015, that the fiscal effect of the Campaign Finance Reform and Transparency Amendment Act of 2013, D.C. Law 20-79, has been included in an approved budget and financial plan was published in the D.C. Register on March 13, 2015 (62 DCR 2988).